ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 오디오 및 비디오 스플리터/스위치 > SDI 스플리터 및 스위치: SDI 스플리터; SDI 스위치
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Divisores y conmutadores de audio y vídeo > Divisores y conmutadores SDI: Divisores SDI; Conmutadores SDI
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Rozbočovače a prepínače zvuku a videa > SDI rozdeľovače a prepínače: SDI rozdeľovače; SDI prepínače
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Splitter e interruttori audio e video > Splitter e switch SDI: Splitter SDI; Switch SDI
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > AV rozbočovače a přepínače > SDI rozbočovače a přepínače: SDI rozbočovače; SDI přepínače
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Аудио- и видеосплитери и превключватели > SDI сплитери и превключватели: SDI сплитери; SDI превключватели
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Ses ve Görüntü Ayırıcıları ve Anahtarları > SDI Bölücüler ve Anahtarlar: SDI Bölücüler; SDI Anahtarlar
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Audio- és videoelosztók és -kapcsolók > SDI-elosztók és -kapcsolók: SDI-elosztók; SDI-kapcsolók
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > AVスプリッター・スイッチ > SDIスプリッター・スイッチャー: SDIスプリッター; SDIスイッチャー
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 音频和视频分配器和切换器 > SDI 分路器和切换器: SDI 分路器; SDI 切换器
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Lyd- og videosplittere og -brytere > SDI-splittere og -brytere: SDI-splittere; SDI-brytere
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Répartiteurs et commutateurs audio et vidéo > Répartiteurs et commutateurs SDI: Répartiteurs SDI; Commutateurs SDI
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > AV 分配器/切換器 > SDI 分配器與切換器: SDI 分配器; SDI 切換器
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Audio- und Video-Splitter & -Switches > SDI-Splitter und -Switches: SDI-Splitter; SDI-Switches
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Rozdzielacze i przełączniki do przesyłania obrazu i dźwięku > Rozdzielacze i przełączniki SDI: Rozdzielacze SDI; Przełączniki SDI
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Kabeldelare och omkopplare för video och ljud > SDI-fördelare och omkopplare: SDI-fördelare; SDI-omkopplare
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Разветвители и коммутаторы аудио- и видеосигналов > Разветвители и переключатели SDI: Разветвители SDI; Переключатели SDI
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > AV-jakajat ja -kytkimet > SDI-jakajat ja -kytkimet: SDI-jakajat; SDI-kytkimet
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Garso ir vaizdo skirstytuvai ir jungikliai > SDI skirstytuvai ir jungikliai: SDI skirstytuvai; SDI jungikliai
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Splittere și comutatoare audio și video > Splittere și switch-uri SDI: Splittere SDI; Switch-uri SDI
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Splitters e interrutores de áudio e vídeo > Divisores e comutadores sdi: Divisores sdi; Comutadores sdi
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Audio i video razdjelnici i sklopke > Razdjelnici i prekidači za SDI: Razdjelnici za SDI; Prekidači za SDI
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες ήχου & βίντεο > Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες SDI: Διαχωριστές SDI; Διακόπτες SDI
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Bộ chia và công tắc âm thanh và hình ảnh > Bộ tách và công tắc SDI: Bộ tách SDI; Công tắc SDI
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Divisores e comutadores de áudio e vídeo > Divisores e chaves SDI: Divisores SDI; Chaves SDI
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Audio & Video Splitters & Switches > SDI Splitters & Switches: SDI Splitters; SDI Switches
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Avdio in video razdelilniki in preklopniki > SDI razdelilniki in preklopniki: SDI razdelilniki; SDI preklopniki
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Audio-/videosplitters en -schakelaars > SDI splitters en switches: SDI splitters; SDI switches
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > สวิตช์และตลับแยก AV > ตัวแยกและสวิตช์ SDI: ตัวแยกสัญญาณ SDI; สวิตช์ SDI
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Lyd og video – fordelere og omskiftere > SDI-fordelere og -omskiftere: SDI-fordelere; SDI-omskiftere